New Mexico, session 2026, SB111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 66-1-4.14 NMSA 1978 (being Laws
1990, Chapter 120, Section 15, as amended) is amended to
read:
"66-1-4.14. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Motor Vehicle
Code:
A. "park" or "parking" means the standing of a
vehicle, whether occupied or not, other than temporarily for
the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading and
unloading;
B. "parking lot" means a parking area provided for
the use of patrons of any office of state or local government
or of any public accommodation, retail or commercial
establishment;
C. "parts car" means a motor vehicle generally in
nonoperable condition that is owned by a collector to furnish
parts that are usually nonobtainable from normal sources,
thus enabling a collector to preserve, restore and maintain a
motor vehicle of historic or special interest;
D. "pedestrian" means any natural person on foot;
E. "person" means every natural person, firm, SB 111
Page 1

copartnership, association, corporation or other legal
entity;
F. "personal information" means information that
identifies an individual, including an individual's
photograph, social security number, driver identification
number, name, address other than zip code, telephone number,
medical or disability information, sex, gender identity,
immigration status or national origin, but "personal
information" does not include information on vehicles,
vehicle ownership, vehicular accidents, driving violations or
driver status;
G. "placard" or "parking placard" means a
card-like device that identifies the vehicle as being
currently in use to transport a person with severe mobility
impairment and issued pursuant to Section 66-3-16 NMSA 1978
to be displayed inside a motor vehicle so as to be readily
visible to an observer outside the vehicle;
H. "platoon" means a series of motor vehicles that

are traveling in a unified manner by means of being connected

with wireless communications or other technology allowing for

coordinated movement;

I. "pneumatic tire" means every tire in which

compressed air is designed to support the load;

J. "pole trailer" means any vehicle without motive

power, designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached
SB 111
Page 2

to the towing vehicle by means of a reach or pole or by being
boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle and
ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped
loads such as poles, structures, pipes and structural members
capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between
the supporting connections;
K. "police or peace officer" means every officer
authorized to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests
for violations of the Motor Vehicle Code;
L. "private road or driveway" means every way or
place in private ownership used for vehicular travel by the
owner and those having express or implied permission from the
owner, but not other persons; and
M. "property owner" means the owner of a piece of
land or the agent of that property owner." SB 111
Page 3